Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6575YC (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. (1) By July 1, 2027, the board shall 3 adopt rules under chapter 17A that require the director to, 4 as part of the practitioner preparation program approval and 5 reevaluation process, determine whether the practitioner 6 preparation program is in compliance with the requirements 7 established under section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraphs âpâ , 8 âqâ , and ârâ , and to notify the board and the institution of 9 higher education providing the practitioner preparation program 10 of the departmentâs determination. 11 (2) The rules adopted pursuant to subparagraph (1) must 12 require that if the director notifies the board and the 13 institution of higher education providing the practitioner 14 preparation program that the director has determined the 15 practitioner preparation program is not in compliance with the 16 requirements established under section 256.16, subsection 1, 17 paragraphs âpâ , âqâ , and ârâ , then the board must allow the 18 institution of higher education providing the practitioner 19 preparation program twelve months to bring the practitioner 20 preparation program into compliance. 21 (3) The rules adopted pursuant to subparagraph (1) 22 must require the board to not approve, or to rescind the 23 approval of, a practitioner preparation program if, after the 24 expiration of the time allotted to the institution of higher 25 education providing the practitioner preparation program under 26 subparagraph (2) to bring the practitioner preparation program 27 into compliance with section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraphs 28 âpâ , âqâ , and ârâ , the director determines the practitioner 29 preparation program is still not in compliance. 30 Sec. 2. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 31 by adding the following new paragraphs: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, discontinue 33 and remove from required preparation, coursework, practicums, 34 seminars, or assessments any instruction, training, or 35 -1- LSB 6575YC (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ pedagogical framework that includes or is derived from any of 1 the following concepts: 2 (a) Diversity, equity, and inclusion theories or practices. 3 (b) Multiculturalism as a behavioral or classroom 4 management framework. 5 (c) Social and emotional learning or social-emotional 6 behavior conditioning models. 7 (2) Beginning July 1, 2027, a higher education institution 8 providing a practitioner preparation program shall not require, 9 promote, or assess the competencies of students admitted to 10 the practitioner preparation program using any of the concepts 11 described in subparagraph (1). 12 (3) For purposes of this paragraph: 13 (a) âDiversity, equity, and inclusionâ means any framework 14 that categorizes or treats individuals differently based 15 on race, ethnicity, gender identity, or other demographic 16 characteristics for the purpose of altering classroom 17 behavioral expectations or management strategies. 18 (b) âMulticulturalismâ means instructional content that 19 frames classroom behavioral expectations through cultural, 20 ethnic, or identity-based norms rather than uniform standards 21 applicable to all students. 22 (c) âSocial and emotional learningâ means any program, 23 curriculum, or framework that prioritizes emotional regulation, 24 self-awareness, or interpersonal skills as a primary method of 25 classroom behavioral control. 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . q. Include explicit, skills-based 27 preparation in firm, consistent, and authority-centered 28 classroom management practices, including but not limited to 29 all of the following: 30 (1) Establishing clear rules, expectations, and 31 consequences associated with violation of such rules or 32 expectations. 33 (2) Maintaining teacher authority and leadership in the 34 classroom. 35 -2- LSB 6575YC (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ (3) Direct and explicit instruction techniques. 1 (4) Structured routines and predictable classroom 2 procedures. 3 (5) Assertive discipline models. 4 (6) Techniques for the immediate correction of disruptive 5 behavior. 6 (7) Strategies for preventing escalation through clarity, 7 consistency, and firm boundaries. 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. (1) Include preparation related to 9 historical or traditional classroom management approaches that 10 emphasize all of the following: 11 (a) Teacher-directed instruction. 12 (b) Order, discipline, and respect for authority. 13 (c) Structured learning environments with minimal 14 behavioral ambiguity. 15 (2) The preparation described in subparagraph (1) may 16 include analysis of classroom management models that were 17 utilized before 1990 if such classroom management models comply 18 with current federal and state law. 19 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 20 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 21 after July 1, 2027: 22 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 23